Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 4 Emergency Telephone Number 9-1-1 System

Cross references.

Emergency management, T. 38, C. 3.

46-5-120.
Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Emergency Telephone Number 9-1-1 Service Act of 1977.”

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1040, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ”
in this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2, effective July 1, 2007, reenacted this Code section without change.

46-5-121.
Legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds and declares that it is in the public interest to shorten the time required for a citizen to request and receive emergency aid. There currently exist numerous different emergency phone numbers throughout the state. Provision for a single, primary three-digit emergency number through which emergency services can be quickly and efficiently obtained would provide a significant contribution to law enforcement and other public service efforts by making it easier to notify public safety personnel. Such a simplified means of procuring emergency services will result in the saving of lives, a reduction in the destruction of property, and quicker apprehension of criminals. It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish and implement a cohesive state-wide emergency telephone number 9-1-1 system which will provide citizens with rapid, direct access to public safety agencies by dialing telephone number 9-1-1 with the objective of reducing the response time to situations requiring law enforcement, fire, medical, rescue, and other emergency services.

The General Assembly further finds and declares that the benefits of 9-1-1 service should be widely available, regardless of whether a 9-1-1 call is placed from a traditional landline telephone or from a wireless telephone. It is also in the public interest that users of wireless telephones should bear some of the cost of providing this lifesaving service, as users of landline telephones currently do. It is the intent of the General Assembly to bring wireless telephone service within the scope of this part and to establish a means by which local public safety agencies may provide enhanced 9-1-1 service to wireless telephone users.

The General Assembly further finds and declares that communication technology is rapidly and constantly changing. It is in the public interest that as different means of accessing 9-1-1 service emerge, that the users of such technology bear some of the cost of providing this lifesaving service, as users of landline and wireless telephones currently do. It is the intent of the General Assembly to bring these new and emerging technologies within the scope of this part and establish a means by which local public safety agencies may provide 9-1-1 service to such users.

The General Assembly further finds and declares that the safety and well-being of the citizens of Georgia is of the utmost importance, and it is in the public interest to provide the highest level of emergency response service on a local, regional, and state-wide basis.

The General Assembly further finds that the collection methodology for prepaid wireless telecommunications service should effectively capture 9-1-1 charges from prepaid users. It is the intent of the General Assembly to move the collection of existing 9-1-1 charges on prepaid wireless service to the retail point of sale.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1040, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1017, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394; Ga. L. 2011, p. 393, § 1/HB 256; Ga. L. 2011, p. 563, § 1/SB 156; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 46/SB 340.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ”
throughout this Code section.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added subsections (c) and (d).

The 2011 amendments.

The first 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, added subsection (e). The second 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, made identical changes.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subsections (b) and (c).

Cross references.

Provision of emergency medical services, Ch. 11, T. 31.

46-5-122.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Addressing” means the assigning of a numerical address and street name (the name may be numerical) to each location within a local government’s geographical area necessary to provide public safety service as determined by the local government. This address replaces any route and box number currently in place in the 9-1-1 data base and facilitates quicker response by public safety agencies.

“Authority” means the Georgia Emergency Communications Authority established pursuant to Code Section 38-3-182.

(2.1)

“Call” means any communication, message, signal, or transmission.

(2.2)

“Center” means the Georgia Public Safety Training Center.

Reserved.

“Cost recovery” means the mechanism by which service suppliers may recover the recurring and nonrecurring costs they expend on the implementation of wireless 9-1-1 services.

“Emergency 9-1-1 system” or “9-1-1 system” means a telephone service, computer service, wireless service, or other service which facilitates the placing of calls by persons in need of emergency services to a public safety answering point by dialing the telephone number 9-1-1 and under which calls to 9-1-1 are answered or otherwise responded to by public safety answering points established and operated by the local government subscribing to the 9-1-1 service. The term “emergency 9-1-1 system” also includes “enhanced 9-1-1 service,” which means an emergency system that provides the user with emergency 9-1-1 system service and, in addition, directs 9-1-1 calls to appropriate public safety answering points by selective routing based on the geographical location from which the call originated and provides the capability for automatic number identification and automatic location identification features.

“Enhanced ZIP Code” means a United States postal ZIP Code of 9 or more digits.

“Exchange access facility” means the access from a particular telephone subscriber’s premises to the telephone system of a service supplier. Exchange access facilities include service supplier provided access lines, PBX trunks, and Centrex network access registers, all as defined by tariffs of the telephone companies as approved by the Georgia Public Service Commission or, in the case of detariffed services, as defined in publicly available guidebooks or other publicly available service supplier publications. The term “exchange access facility” also includes Voice over Internet Protocol service suppliers and any other communication, message, signal, or information delivery system capable of initiating a 9-1-1 emergency call. Exchange access facilities do not include service supplier owned and operated telephone pay station lines, Wide Area Telecommunications Services (WATS), Foreign Exchange (FX), or incoming only lines.

“FIPS” means the Federal Information Processing Standard (FIPS) 55-3 or any future enhancement.

“Local government” means any city, county, military base, or political subdivision of Georgia and its agencies.

“Mobile telecommunications service” means commercial mobile radio service, as such term is defined in 47 C.F.R. Section 20.3.

“9-1-1 charge” means a contribution to the local government for the 9-1-1 service start-up equipment costs, subscriber notification costs, addressing costs, billing costs, nonrecurring and recurring installation, maintenance, service, and network charges of a service supplier providing 9-1-1 service pursuant to this part, and costs associated with the hiring, training, and compensating of dispatchers employed by the local government to operate said 9-1-1 system at the public safety answering points.

(11.1)

“9-1-1 number” means the digits, address, Internet Protocol address, or other information used to access or initiate a call to a public safety answering point.

“Place of primary use” means the street address representative of where the customer’s use of the mobile telecommunications service primarily occurs, which must be the residential street address or the primary business street address of the customer.

(12.1)

“Prepaid wireless service” means any method where a telephone subscriber pays in advance for a wireless telecommunications connection:

That is sold in predetermined units or dollars:

The number of which declines with use in a known amount; and

Which expire without an additional retail purchase of units or dollars;

That is not offered in conjunction with other communications services for which the terms permit payment in arrears; and

The charges for which are:

Not billed to any telephone subscriber or other person; or

Not provided to a telephone subscriber or other person in a monthly statement.

Such term shall include, without limitation, calling or usage privileges included with the purchase of a wireless telephone as well as additional calling or usage privileges purchased by any means, including, without limitation, a calling card, a call, or an Internet transaction.

“Public agency” means the state and any city, county, city and county, municipal corporation, chartered organization, public district, or public authority located in whole or in part within this state which provides or has authority to provide fire-fighting, law enforcement, ambulance, medical, or other emergency services.

“Public safety agency” means a functional division of a public agency which provides fire-fighting, law enforcement, emergency medical, suicide prevention, emergency management dispatching, poison control, drug prevention, child abuse, spouse abuse, or other emergency services.

“Public safety answering point” means the public safety agency which receives incoming 9-1-1 telephone calls and dispatches appropriate public safety agencies to respond to such calls.

“Service supplier” means a person or entity who provides telephone service to a telephone subscriber.

(16.1) (A)

“Telephone service” means any method by which a 9-1-1 emergency call is delivered to a public safety answering point. Such term shall include local exchange access facilities or other telephone communication service, wireless service, mobile telecommunications service, computer service, Voice over Internet Protocol service, or any technology that delivers a call to a public safety answering point that is:

Capable of contacting and has been enabled to contact a public safety answering point via a 9-1-1 system by entering or dialing the digits 9-1-1;

A telecommunications service as such term is defined in Code Section 48-8-2; and

Neither a prepaid calling service nor a prepaid wireless calling service as such terms are defined in Code Section 48-8-2.

“Telephone subscriber” means a person or entity to which retail telephone service, either residential or commercial, is provided.

(17.1)

“Voice over Internet Protocol service” includes any technology that permits a voice conversation through any device using a voice connection to a computer, whether through a microphone, a telephone, or other device that sends a digital signal over the Internet through a broadband connection to be converted back to the human voice at a distant terminal and that delivers a call to a public safety answering point. Voice over Internet Protocol service shall also include interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol service, which is service that enables real-time, two-way voice communications, requires a broadband connection from the user’s location, requires Internet protocol compatible customer premises equipment, and allows users to receive calls that originate on the public service telephone network and to terminate calls to the public switched telephone network.

(17.2)

“Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier” means a person or entity who provides Voice over Internet Protocol service to subscribers for a fee.

“Wireless enhanced 9-1-1 charge” means a contribution to the local government for the following:

The costs to the local government of implementing or upgrading, and maintaining, an emergency 9-1-1 system which is capable of receiving and utilizing the following information, as it relates to 9-1-1 calls made from a wireless telecommunications connection: automatic number identification, the location of the base station or cell site which receives the 9-1-1 call, and the location of the wireless telecommunications connection;

Nonrecurring and recurring installation, maintenance, service, and network charges of a wireless service supplier to provide the information described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; and

Other costs which may be paid with money from the Emergency Telephone System Fund, pursuant to subsection (f) of Code Section 46-5-134.

“Wireless service” means “commercial mobile service” as defined under Section 332(D) of the federal Telecommunications Act of 1996 (47 U.S.C. Section 157, et seq.), regulations of the Federal Communications Commission, and the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-66) and includes real-time, two-way interconnected voice service which is provided over networks which utilize intelligent switching capability and offer seamless handoff to customers. The term does not include one-way signaling service, data transmission service, nonlocal radio access line service, or a private telecommunications service. The term does include prepaid wireless service.

“Wireless service supplier” means a provider of wireless service.

“Wireless telecommunications connection” means any mobile station for wireless service that connects a provider of wireless service to a provider of telephone service.

(B)

When a service supplier provides to the same person, business, or organization the voice channel capacity to make more than one simultaneous outbound call from an exchange access facility, then each such separate outbound call voice channel capacity, regardless of technology, shall constitute a separate telephone service.

(C)

When the same person, business, or organization has several wireless telephones, each wireless telecommunications connection shall constitute a separate telephone service; provided, however, that multiple wireless devices that share a single telephone number and which are generally offered for use primarily by a single individual shall constitute a single telephone service.

(D)

A broadband connection used for telephone service shall not constitute a separate voice channel capacity subscription for purposes of the 9-1-1 charge.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1040, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 46; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1984, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 179, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 93, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1368, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1017, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 873, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 46; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394; Ga. L. 2011, p. 240, § 1/HB 280; Ga. L. 2012, p. 820, § 1/HB 1049; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 19/SB 416; Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 2-1/HB 751.

The 2004 amendment,

effective May 13, 2004, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in paragraph (12).

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ” throughout this Code section; redesignated former paragraphs (1.1) and (2) as present paragraphs (2) and (3), respectively; added present paragraph (4); redesignated former paragraph (3) as present paragraph (5); added present paragraph (6); redesignated former paragraph (4) as present paragraph (7); added present paragraph (8); redesignated former paragraph (5) as present paragraph (9); added present paragraph (10); redesignated former paragraph (6) as present paragraph (11); added present paragraph (12); redesignated former paragraphs (7) through (14) as present paragraphs (13) through (21), respectively; and in present paragraph (14), substituted “emergency management dispatching” for “civil defense”.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added paragraphs (2.1) through (2.3), (11.1), (12.1), (16.1), (17.1), and (17.2); in paragraph (5), in the first sentence, inserted “or ‘9-1-1 system’ ”, deleted “local exchange” preceding “telephone service” near the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “, computer service,” for “or”, inserted “, or other service”, inserted “or otherwise responded to”, and, in the second sentence, deleted “telephone” preceding “system that provides” near the beginning, and substituted “user” for “caller”; substituted “Code” for “code” twice in paragraph (6); added the present third sentence in paragraph (7); substituted the present provision of paragraph (16) for the former provisions which read: “ ‘Service supplier’ means a person or entity who provides local exchange telephone service or wireless service to a telephone subscriber.”; substituted the present provisions of the first sentence of paragraph (17) for the former provisions which read: “ ‘Telephone subscriber’ means a person or entity to whom local exchange telephone service or wireless service, either residential or commercial, is provided and in return for which the person or entity is billed on a monthly basis.”; added the present last sentence in paragraph (19); and deleted “local exchange” preceding “telephone service” in paragraph (21).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “subsection (f)” for “subsection (e)” in subparagraph (18)(C).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (12.1) for the former provisions, which read: “ ‘Prepaid wireless service’ means any method pursuant to which a customer pays a wireless service provider in advance for a wireless telecommunications connection. Such term shall include, without limitation, calling or usage privileges included with the purchase of a wireless telephone as well as additional calling or usage privileges purchased by any means, including, without limitation, a calling card, a wireless communication, or an Internet transaction.”

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, inserted “and Homeland Security” in paragraph (2).

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (2) for the former provisions, which read: “ ‘Agency’ means the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency established pursuant to Code Section 38-3-20 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.”; deleted paragraph (2.3), which read: “ ‘Department’ means the Department of Community Affairs established pursuant to Code Section 50-8-1.”; substituted the present provisions of paragraph (3) for the former provisions, which read: “ ‘Director’ means the director of emergency management appointed pursuant to Code Section 38-3-20.”; added “or, in the case of detariffed services, as defined in publicly available guidebooks or other publicly available service supplier publications” at the end of the second sentence of paragraph (7); substituted the present provisions of paragraph (16.1) for the former provisions, which read: “ ‘Telephone service’ means any method by which a 9-1-1 emergency call is delivered to a public safety answering point. The term ‘telephone service’ shall include local exchange telephone service or other telephone communication service, wireless service, prepaid wireless service, mobile telecommunications service, computer service, Voice over Internet Protocol service, or any technology that delivers or is required by law to deliver a call to a public safety answering point.”; substituted the present provisions of paragraph (17) for the former provisions, which read: “ ‘Telephone subscriber’ means a person or entity to whom telephone service, either residential or commercial, is provided. When the same person, business, or organization has several telephone access lines, each exchange access facility shall constitute a separate subscription. When the same person, business, or organization has several wireless telephones, each wireless telecommunications connection shall constitute a separate connection.”; and, in paragraph (17.1), in the first sentence, substituted “includes” for “means” near the beginning, inserted “through any device” near the middle, substituted “device that” for “device, which” in the middle, and deleted “or is required by law to deliver” following “that delivers” near the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2007, in paragraph (7), the comma following “facility” in the third sentence was deleted.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 2-1/HB 751 provides for the repeal of paragraph (2.3) and the repeal and reservation of paragraph (3), effective January 1, 2019.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1(b)/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019.
Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”

46-5-123.
[Reserved] Creation of 9-1-1 Advisory Committee; selection of members; filling of vacancies; organization; roles and responsibilities.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1040, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1017, § 4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 372, § 4; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394; repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 2-2/HB 751, effective January 1, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 2-2/HB 751 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective January 1, 2019.

46-5-124.
Guidelines for implementing state-wide emergency 9-1-1 system; training and equipment standards.

The authority shall develop guidelines for implementing a state-wide emergency 9-1-1 system. The guidelines shall provide for:

Steps of action necessary for public agencies to effect the necessary coordination, regulation, and development preliminary to a 9-1-1 system that shall incorporate the requirements of each public service agency in each local government of Georgia;

Identification of mutual aid agreements necessary to effect the 9-1-1 system, including coordination on behalf of the State of Georgia with any federal agency to secure financial assistance or other desirable activities in connection with the receipt of funding that may be provided to communities for the planning, development, or implementation of the 9-1-1 system;

The coordination necessary between local governments planning or developing a 9-1-1 system and other state agencies, the Public Service Commission, all affected utility and telephone companies, wireless service suppliers, and other agencies;

The actions to establish emergency telephone service necessary to meet the requirements for each local government, including law enforcement, fire-fighting, medical, suicide prevention, rescue, or other emergency services; and

The actions to be taken by a local government desiring to provide wireless enhanced 9-1-1 service, including requirements contained in 47 C.F.R. Section 20.18.

The authority shall be responsible for encouraging and promoting the planning, development, and implementation of local 9-1-1 system plans. The authority shall develop any necessary procedures to be followed by public agencies for implementing and coordinating such plans and shall mediate whenever disputes arise or agreements cannot be reached between the local political jurisdiction and other entities involving the 9-1-1 system.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no communications officer hired to the staff of a public safety answering point shall be required to complete his or her training pursuant to Code Section 35-8-23 prior to being hired or employed for such position.

The authority shall maintain the registry of wireless service suppliers provided for in Code Section 46-5-124.1.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1040, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1017, § 5; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 46; Ga. L. 1999, p. 873, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394; Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 2-3/HB 751.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ” throughout subsections (a), (b), and (c).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “telephone number” following “state-wide emergency” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a); substituted “shall” for “will” in paragraph (a)(1); substituted “service” for “communications” in paragraph (a)(4); and, in subsection (c), deleted the former first two sentences which read: “Subject to the approval of the Governor, the director shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to establish minimum standards relating to training and equipment. Such training standards shall not be inconsistent with the training course or certification required for communications officers under Code Section 35-8-23.”, and substituted “public safety answering point” for “ ‘ 9-1-1’ communications center” near the middle.

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, substituted “authority” for “agency” throughout this Code section; and substituted “C.F.R.” for “Code of Federal Regulations” in paragraph (a)(5). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

The plan for implementing a statewide emergency telephone number “911” system required by former Code Section 46-5-124 was submitted to the committee for its review on October 29, 1979. A meeting of the committee was held November 19, 1979, at which time the plan and the effective date were approved. The plan became effective on December 1, 1979.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1(b)/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019.
Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”

46-5-124.1.
Service suppliers or Voice over Internet Protocol service suppliers must register certain information with the authority; updating information; compliance; notices of deficiency or noncompliance.

Any service supplier or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier doing business in Georgia shall register the following information by January 1, 2019, with the authority:

The name, address, and telephone number of the representative of the service supplier or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier to whom the resolution adopted pursuant to Code Section 46-5-133 or other notification of intent to provide automatic number identification or automatic location identification, or both, of a telephone service connection;

The name, address, and telephone number of the representative of the service supplier or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier with whom a local government must coordinate to implement automatic number identification or automatic location identification, or both, of a telephone service connection;

The counties in Georgia in which the service supplier or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier is authorized to provide and is actively providing telephone service at the time the filing is made; and

Every corporate name under which the service supplier or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier is authorized to provide telephone service in Georgia.

After the initial submission by each service supplier or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier doing business in this state, if the information required by subsection (a) of this Code section changes, it shall be updated and submitted to the authority within 60 days of such change.

Every service supplier or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier shall comply with subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section. Any service supplier or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier that fails to register and provide the information required by this Code section after receiving notice of the deficiency or noncompliance duly served upon the service supplier’s or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier’s registered agent and failing to cure the deficiency or noncompliance within 60 days of receiving notice shall:

Not be eligible to receive cost recovery funds as provided in subsection (e) of Code Section 46-5-134 until the service supplier or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier is in compliance with subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section;

Be subject to a fine by the authority in the amount of $1,000.00 per day for each day of failure to comply with subsection (b) of this Code section; and

When audited, not be subject to the three-year limit under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 38-3-189.

Subsection (c) of this Code section shall apply only so long as the deficiency or noncompliance remains uncured.

The authority may share the service supplier registry with the Department of Revenue to ensure proper collection and remittance of all 9-1-1 charges.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-124.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 873, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 46/SB 465; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394; Ga. L. 2011, p. 240, § 2/HB 280; Ga. L. 2012, p. 820, § 2/HB 1049; Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 2-4/HB 751.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “Any service provider doing business” for “Any wireless service supplier that provides wireless service or is authorized to provide wireless service” at the beginning of subsection (a); deleted “wireless” preceding “service supplier” in paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(3), and (a)(4); inserted “at the time the filing is made” in paragraph (a)(3); rewrote subsection (b), which read: “A wireless service supplier shall notify the director of any change to the information described in subsection (a) of this Code section within 30 days of such change.”; and added subsection (c).

The 2006 amendment,

effective April 14, 2006, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “service supplier” for “service provider” once in subsection (a), and three places in subsection (c).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “telephone service” for “wireless telecommunications” in paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2); and substituted “telephone service” for “wireless service” in paragraphs (a)(3) and (a)(4).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, inserted “or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier” throughout this Code section; and substituted “or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier that fails” for “which fails” in the third sentence of subsection (c).

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, in subsection (a), inserted “by January 1, 2019,” and substituted “authority” for “director” in the introductory paragraph, deleted “should be submitted” following “connection” at the end of paragraph (a)(1), and inserted “and is actively providing” in the middle of paragraph (a)(3); in subsection (b), inserted “if” near the middle, inserted “changes, it” in the middle, and substituted “authority within 60 days of such change” for “director by the tenth day of January and the tenth day of July of each year or such other semiannual schedule as the director may establish”; and substituted the present provisions of subsection (c) for the former provisions, which read: “The director shall send a notice of delinquency to any service supplier or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier which fails to comply with subsection (b) of this Code section. Such notice shall be sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery. Any service supplier or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier that fails to register and provide the information required by this Code section within 30 days after receipt of a notice of delinquency shall not be eligible to receive cost recovery funds as provided in subsection (e) of Code Section 46-5-134 until the service supplier or Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier is in compliance with subsection (b) of this Code section.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, “is” was inserted preceding “in compliance” in the last sentence of subsection (c) [now paragraph (c)(1)].

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2, effective July 1, 2007, reenacted this Code section without change.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1(b)/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019.
Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”

46-5-125.
Formation of multijurisdictional and regional 9-1-1 systems.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit or discourage the formation of multijurisdictional or regional 9-1-1 systems; and any system established pursuant to this part may include the jurisdiction, or any portion thereof, of more than one public agency.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1040, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 46/SB 465; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ” in this Code section.

The 2006 amendment,

effective April 14, 2006, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “9-1-1” for “911” in this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2, effective July 1, 2007, reenacted this Code section without change.

46-5-126.
Cooperation by commission and telephone industry.

The authority shall coordinate its activities with those of the Public Service Commission, which shall encourage the Georgia telephone industry to activate facility modification plans for a timely 9-1-1 implementation.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1040, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1017, § 15; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394; Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 2-5/HB 751.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ” in this Code section.

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, substituted “authority” for “agency” near the beginning of this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2, effective July 1, 2007, reenacted this Code section without change.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1(b)/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019.
Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”

46-5-127.
Approval of 9-1-1 systems by agency; written confirmation by authority required for 9-1-1 systems established on or after January 1, 2019.

After January 1, 1978, and prior to January 1, 2019, no emergency 9-1-1 system shall be established, and no existing system shall be expanded to provide wireless enhanced 9-1-1 service, without written confirmation by the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency that the local plan conforms to the guidelines and procedures provided for in Code Section 46-5-124.

On or after January 1, 2019, no emergency 9-1-1 system shall be established, and no existing system shall be expanded to provide wireless enhanced 9-1-1 service, without written confirmation by the authority that the local plan conforms to the guidelines and procedures provided for in Code Section 46-5-124. The authority shall not deny establishment of a new system or an expansion to provide wireless enhanced 9-1-1 service if the local plan conforms to the guidelines and procedures provided for in Code Section 46-5-124.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1040, § 8; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1017, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394; Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 2-6/HB 751.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ” twice in this Code section.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “telephone number” preceding “9-1-1 system” near the beginning of this Code section.

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a); in subsection (a), inserted “and prior to January 1, 2019,” near the beginning and substituted “Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency” for “agency” in the middle; and added subsection (b). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1(b)/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019.
Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”

46-5-128.
Cooperation by public agencies.

All public agencies shall assist the authority in its efforts to carry out the intent of this part; and such agencies shall comply with the guidelines developed pursuant to Code Section 46-5-124 by furnishing a resolution of intent regarding an emergency 9-1-1 system.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1040, § 9; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1017, § 7; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394; Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 2-7/HB 751.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ” in this Code section.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “telephone number” preceding “9-1-1 system” near the end of this Code section.

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, substituted “authority” for “agency” near the middle of this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1(b)/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019.
Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”

46-5-129.
Use of 9-1-1 emblem.

The authority may develop a 9-1-1 emblem which may be utilized on marked vehicles used by public safety agencies participating in a local 9-1-1 system.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 699, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1017, § 8; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 9/HB 470; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2/HB 394; Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 2-8/HB 751.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “9-1-1” for “ ‘911’ ” twice in this Code section.

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, substituted “authority” for “agency” near the beginning of this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 2, effective July 1, 2007, reenacted this Code section without change.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1(b)/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019.
Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”